Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202053-103.21
Microbrewery, defined.

Microbrewery means any small brewery producing a maximum of twenty thousand barrels of beer per year.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 29;

Laws 2012, LB780, § 2.